Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Juvenile Detention Facilities

15A.200.
Definitions for KRS 15A.210 to 15A.240 and KRS 15A.990.

As used in KRS

15A.210

to

15A.240

and KRS

15A.990

:

“Certified juvenile facility staff” means individuals who meet the qualifications of, and who have completed a course of education and training developed and approved by, the Department of Juvenile Justice;

“Secure juvenile detention facility” means any facility used for the secure detention of children other than a jail, police station, lockup, or any building which is a part of or attached to any facility in which adult prisoners are confined or which shares staff with a facility in which adult prisoners are confined;

“Youth alternative center” means a nonsecure facility, approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice, for the nonsecure detention of juveniles; and

The term “facility” or “facilities” as used in KRS

15A.210

to

15A.240

shall mean the facilities defined in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 172, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 130, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 72, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 443, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 534, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 257, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 132, § 8, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This statute has been amended by 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 443 (making a substantive nonrevisory change) and ch. 426 (which made a name change due to reorganization and is revisory in nature). The nonrevisory change prevails. KRS 7.136(3).

Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 199 provides: “KRS

446.250

to

446.320

to the contrary notwithstanding, Acts 1986, ch. 423 shall prevail in the event of a conflict between Acts 1986, ch. 423 and other Acts passed by the 1986 Regular Session of the General Assembly.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.24.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Juvenile Court, Form 5.4.

15A.210.
Administrative regulations governing secure juvenile detention facilities.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate and enforce administrative regulations to govern at least the following aspects of the operation of facilities:

Administration;

Personnel;

Training and staff development;

Recordkeeping;

Physical plant;

Security and control;

Safety and emergency procedures;

Sanitation and hygiene;

Medical and health services;

Food services;

Intake and classification;

Programs and services;

Residents’ rights;

Rules and discipline;

Admission procedures;

Communication, including mail, visitation, and telephone;

Release preparation and transfer programs;

Volunteer involvement;

Transfers;

Reimbursement rates and conditions; and

Detention facility rate increases.

Administrative regulations promulgated under this section shall specifically identify new requirements of the law which increase the cost of operating a juvenile facility not operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice. The administrative regulations shall identify the amount and source of funding for compliance with the new requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 173, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 131, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 443, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Juvenile Court, Form 5.5.

15A.220.
Requirements for secure juvenile detention facilities — Decertification.

Each person or organization operating a facility shall register with the Department of Juvenile Justice and shall comply with the regulations issued pursuant to KRS

15A.210

.

Each organization operating or seeking to operate or expand a facility shall:

Apply to the Department of Juvenile Justice in a period of time set by administrative regulation prior to the scheduled opening of the facility;

Permit inspection of the facility by the Department of Juvenile Justice not less than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled opening of the facility; and

Supply to the Department of Juvenile Justice not less than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled opening of the facility all data, plans, and other materials required by the Department of Juvenile Justice.

No facility shall operate except with the approval of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall have the authority, upon thirty (30) days’ written notice to the county judge/executive and jailer of any county that operates a juvenile detention facility and is located within an area served by a state-operated juvenile detention facility, to decertify any juvenile detention facility and that facility shall, at the expiration of the thirty (30) day period, cease detaining juveniles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 174, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 132, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 443, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 4, effective July 15, 2002.

15A.230.
Inspection and reporting of secure juvenile detention facilities.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall inspect, at least annually, each registered facility to assure its compliance with administrative regulations.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may require reports and other data at least annually from each facility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 175, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 133, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 443, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

15A.240.
Enforcement by Department of Juvenile Justice.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall enforce the provisions of KRS

15A.210

to

15A.230

and the administrative regulations issued thereunder.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may institute legal proceedings including but not limited to injunctive remedies to secure compliance with the provisions of KRS

15A.210

to

15A.230

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 176, effective July 1, 1987; 1998, ch. 443, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Juvenile Court, Form 5.5.

15A.245.
Detention Facility Standards Committee — Membership. [Repealed.]

15A.250.
Local alternatives to detention fund. [Repealed.]

15A.260.
Use of fund. [Repealed.]